Colorado, session 2026A, SB166.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-31-107, amend
(5) as follows:
22-31-107. Candidates for school director - call - qualification
- nomination - definitions.
(5) (a) (I) Any A person who has been convicted of commission
of a sexual offense against a child shall not be IS NOT eligible for the
office of school director of a school district. ADDITIONALLY, A PERSON
WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES AND
WAS EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD OR OLDER AT THE TIME OF THE OFFENSE IS NOT
ELIGIBLE FOR THE OFFICE OF SCHOOL DIRECTOR OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT
WHEN FEWER THAN TEN YEARS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE PERSON SATISFIED
EVERY ASPECT OF THE SENTENCE IMPOSED FOR THE CONVICTION,
INCLUDING INCARCERATION, FINANCIAL PENALTIES, AND PAROLE:
(A) A CRIME OF VIOLENCE; OR
(B) A FELONY DRUG OFFENSE INVOLVING DISTRIBUTION,
MANUFACTURING, DISPENSING, OR SALE.
(II) If a person becomes ineligible pursuant to the terms of this
subsection (5) while serving as a school director, a vacancy shall be IS
deemed to exist that shall MUST be filled as provided in section
22-31-129.
(b) For purposes of AS USED IN this subsection (5), UNLESS THE
CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(I) "CRIME OF VIOLENCE" MEANS AN OFFENSE DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 18-1.3-406, OR AN OFFENSE WITH SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR
-2- 166

ELEMENTS UNDER THE LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE, THE UNITED STATES, OR
ANY TERRITORY SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION OF THE UNITED STATES.
"CRIME OF VIOLENCE" ALSO MEANS ATTEMPT, SOLICITATION, OR
CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT ANY OF THE OFFENSES SPECIFIED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (5)(b)(I).
(II) "FELONY DRUG OFFENSE INVOLVING DISTRIBUTION,
MANUFACTURING, DISPENSING, OR SALE" MEANS A FELONY DRUG OFFENSE
DESCRIBED IN PART 4 OF ARTICLE 18 OF TITLE 18 INVOLVING
DISTRIBUTION, MANUFACTURING, DISPENSING, OR SALE OF A CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCE OR A CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE ANALOG, OR AN OFFENSE WITH
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR ELEMENTS UNDER THE LAWS OF ANOTHER STATE,
THE UNITED STATES, OR ANY TERRITORY SUBJECT TO THE JURISDICTION
OF THE UNITED STATES. "FELONY DRUG OFFENSE INVOLVING
DISTRIBUTION, MANUFACTURING, DISPENSING, OR SALE" ALSO MEANS
ATTEMPT, SOLICITATION, OR CONSPIRACY TO COMMIT ANY OF THE
OFFENSES SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (5)(b)(II).
(III) "Sexual offense against a child" means any of the offenses
described in sections 18-3-305, 18-3-405, 18-3-405.3, 18-3-504 (2),
18-6-301, 18-6-302, 18-6-403, 18-6-404, and 18-7-402 to 18-7-406,
C.R.S., and any of the offenses described in sections 18-3-402 to
18-3-404 and 18-7-302, C.R.S., where the victim is less than eighteen
years of age SECTIONS 18-3-305, 18-3-402, 18-3-404, 18-3-405,
18-3-405.3, 18-3-405.4, 18-3-504 (2), 18-6-301, 18-6-302, 18-6-403,
18-6-404, 18-7-302, 18-7-402, 18-7-403, 18-7-404, 18-7-405, AND
18-7-406 WHEN THE VICTIM IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD, OR AN
OFFENSE WITH SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR ELEMENTS UNDER THE LAWS OF
ANOTHER STATE, THE UNITED STATES, OR ANY TERRITORY SUBJECT TO
-3- 166

THE JURISDICTION OF THE UNITED STATES. "Sexual offense against a
child" also means attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any of the
offenses specified in this paragraph (b) SUBSECTION (5)(b)(III).
(c) For purposes of this subsection (5), "convicted" includes
having pleaded PLEADING guilty or nolo contendere or having received
RECEIVING a deferred judgment and sentence; except that a person shall
MUST not be deemed to have been convicted if the person has successfully
completed a deferred sentence.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- 166